Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-20] Duty to make reports.
Except as otherwise provided by law, the authority shall be responsible for the
following reports:

(1) The authority shall file at least once a year
with the governor a report of its activities for the preceding fiscal year;

(2) The authority shall report to the comptroller on
moneys deposited in depositories other than the state treasury under section
40-81, and rules adopted thereunder; and

(3) The authority shall submit an annual report to
the legislature on all program areas no later than twenty days prior to the
convening of each regular session, that shall provide the following information
on the status of its programs and finances:

(A) A financial audit and report conducted on
an annual basis by a certified public accounting firm; and

(B) Recommendations with reference to any
additional legislation or other action that may be necessary to carry out the
purposes of this chapter. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next